Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-308 Membership. Each holder of
one or more insurance contracts issued by a domestic mutual insurer, other than
a contract of reinsurance, is a member of the insurer, with the rights and
obligations of such membership, and each insurance contract issued shall so
stipulate. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next